Utah statutes.
19-5-123.   Underground Wastewater Disposal System Restricted Account
created -- Contents -- Use of account money.
(1)  The Underground Wastewater Disposal System Restricted Account is created
within the General Fund.
(2)  The contents of the account shall consist of:
(a)  revenue from fees collected under Sections 19-5-121 and 19-5-122; and
(b)  interest and earnings on account money.
(3)  Money in the account shall be appropriated by the Legislature to the
department for costs of training, testing, and certifying individuals who
design, inspect, maintain, or conduct percolation or soils tests for
underground wastewater disposal systems.
